Colorado, session 2026A, SB057.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-31-105, amend
(2), (4)(a), (4)(b), and (6)(a); and add (2.5) as follows:
22-31-105. School directors - number - election - term - plan
of representation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 22-31-131 (1.5)(b)(I)
and subsection (6.5) SUBSECTIONS (1)(b), (2.5), AND (6.5) of this section,
all school directors shall MUST be voted on at large by the eligible electors
of the entire school district, regardless of the school district's plan of
representation BY THE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS RESIDING WITHIN THE DIRECTOR
DISTRICT.
(2.5) SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
SCHOOL DISTRICT WHOSE TOTAL STUDENT ENROLLMENT IS SIX THOUSAND
FIVE HUNDRED OR FEWER STUDENTS IN THE SCHOOL YEAR IN WHICH A
DIRECTOR ELECTION OCCURS OR ANY OF THE FIVE SCHOOL YEARS BEFORE
THE DIRECTOR ELECTION OCCURS. FOR A DISTRICT DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (2.5), SCHOOL DIRECTORS MAY BE VOTED ON AT LARGE BY
THE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS OF THE ENTIRE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S PLAN OF REPRESENTATION.
(4) (a) The board of education of a school district may, by
resolution passed by a majority of the whole board, submit to the eligible
electors of the school district, at the next regular biennial school election,
a proposal to change the number of directors; except that the school
district shall not elect fewer than five nor more than seven directors. The
proposal shall MUST be adopted by resolution of the board at least one
hundred ten days prior to the election. As provided in subsection (7) of
-2- SB26-057

this section, the board of education may simultaneously adopt a resolution
to submit a proposal to change the school district plan of representation;
except that, if the existing school directors are elected pursuant to a
director district plan of representation, the board of education shall
simultaneously adopt a resolution to submit a proposal to either change
the boundaries of the director districts to reflect the change in the number
of directors, or change the school district plan of representation to adopt
an at-large plan of representation or a combined director district and
at-large plan of representation UNLESS A SCHOOL DISTRICT IS SUBJECT TO
SECTION 22-31-131 OR SUBSECTION (1)(b) OR (2.5) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) Upon receipt of a written petition that meets the requirements
specified in this paragraph (b) SUBSECTION (4)(b), the board of education
of a school district shall submit to the eligible electors of the school
district, at the next regular biennial school election, a proposal to change
the number of directors; except that the school district shall not elect
fewer than five nor more than seven directors. As provided in subsection
(7) of this section, the persons submitting the petition may simultaneously
submit a petition to change the school district plan of representation. If
the existing school directors are elected pursuant to a director district plan
of representation and no change to the school district plan of
representation is submitted by petition, the board of education shall adopt
a resolution to submit a proposal to either change the boundaries of the
director districts to reflect the change in the number of directors, UNLESS
A SCHOOL DISTRICT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 22-31-131 OR SUBSECTION
(1)(b) OR (2.5) OF THIS SECTION, or change the school district plan of
representation to adopt an at-large plan of representation or a combined
director district and at-large plan of representation. Any petition
-3- SB26-057

submitted pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall SUBSECTION (4)(b) MUST be
signed by at least five percent of the eligible electors of the district and
shall MUST be submitted to the secretary of the board of education at least
one hundred ten days prior to the election.
(6) (a) The board of education of any school district that desires
to propose a change in its plan of representation may submit a plan to
implement such THE change to the eligible electors of the school district
at any regular biennial school election or at a special school election
called by the board for that purpose. A change in the plan of
representation may consist of the adoption of a director district plan of
representation, the elimination of a director district plan of representation
and replacement with an at-large plan of representation, or the adoption
of a plan of representation that combines director districts with an at-large
plan of representation. A DISTRICT THAT IS SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION IS PROHIBITED FROM CHANGING ITS PLAN OF
REPRESENTATION TO AN AT-LARGE PLAN OF REPRESENTATION. The plan
shall MUST be adopted by the board of education at least one hundred ten
days prior to the election.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-4- SB26-057

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- SB26-057